West Virginia, session 2026, HB4301.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 9 - 1. Board of Optometry. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-8-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Optometry to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 18, 2025, relating to the Board of Optometry (schedule of fees, 14 CSR 05), is authorized.